Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-16] Confidentiality of
collaborative law communication. A collaborative law communication is
confidential to the extent agreed by the parties in a signed record or as
provided by law of this State other than this chapter. [L 2012, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next